Utah statutes.
39-1-46.   Arsenal -- Military supplies -- Loss.

The governor is hereby authorized to provide an arsenal for the storage of arms, equipment and military supplies.  Military supplies shall be issued upon requisition of the officer requiring the same.  Military supplies for the respective organizations shall be issued to and receipted for by the commanding officer thereof, who shall be responsible to the state for the care and preservation of the same.  Commanding officers shall be responsible to this state for the money value of all property issued to them, which may be lost by reason of carelessness and negligence upon their part.



Amended by Chapter 63, 1953 General Session

